Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Capital Construction Projects

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 399, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, repealed Laws 2003, ch. 145, § 1, noted under this article in the 2003 edition, which had appropriated $5,300,000 to the University of Wyoming to construct the Wyoming Business Technology Center on the university's campus.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

§ 21-17-401.
Certain portions of campus restricted to park or recreational purposes; construction of buildings or structures prohibited thereon.

That portion of the campus of the University of Wyoming described as follows is restricted to park or recreational purposes only and no structure shall be constructed on the tract without the approval of the legislature:

A tract of land in the southwest corner of the property known as the campus of the University of Wyoming, in Albany county, Wyoming, which is bounded on the south by a street in the city of Laramie designated as Ivinson Avenue; on the west by a street in the said city designated as Ninth (9th) Street; on the north by an easterly extension of the north line of the street in said city designated as University Avenue; and on the east by an extension, north and south, of the west line of the building known as Hoyt Hall and located on said campus.

In order to preserve the natural and open beauty of that portion of the University of Wyoming campus commonly known and referred to as “Prexy’s Pasture”, no structures, other than ornamental improvements, or buildings of any kind or type shall be located or constructed upon the portion of the campus described as follows:

All that portion of the East 1/2 of Section 33, Township 16 N, R 73 W, of the 6th PM, Albany county, Wyoming, bounded as follows:

Beginning at a point from which the East 1/4 corner of said Section 33 bears South 83 degrees 15' East a distance of 803 feet; thence South 5 degrees 45' West a distance of 410 feet; thence North 84 degrees 15' West a distance of 578 feet; thence North 5 degrees 45' East a distance of 410 feet; thence South 84 degrees 15' East a distance of 578 feet, more or less, to the point of beginning. Said parcel of land containing 5.44 acres, more or less.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 223, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.49:3; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-402

; Laws 2019, ch. 123, § 1.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(i)(A), substituted "South 84 degrees 15' East" for "North 84 degrees 15' East," and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or (b)(ii) or subparagraph (b)(i)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-17-402.
Short title.

W.S.

21-17-402

through

21-17-450

shall be known and may be cited as the “University Securities Law.”

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.50; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-402

.

§ 21-17-403.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this act to provide a procedure for financing any projects authorized by law and for the issuance of securities to evidence or reevidence obligations incurred in connection with any projects authorized by the legislature. This act is supplemental in nature, and nothing herein contained shall be construed as authorizing any particular project nor as authorizing the incurrence of any obligations to defray the cost of any project or construction until the construction or project is specifically authorized by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.51; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-403

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both sentences, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 3, subsection 67, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $150,000 for the design and construction of a facility to house a statue of Chief Washakie, including a proper base on which to place the statue, appropriate lighting, signing and other necessary support for the statue. The facility must be situated on or within close proximity to the Washakie center building located on the university campus, and the facility location and design must be reviewed and approved by the university board of trustees and the select committee on tribal relations.

§ 21-17-404.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

21-17-402

through

21-17-450

:

“Acquisition” or “acquire” means the opening, laying out, establishment, purchase, construction, securing, installation, reconstruction, lease, gift, grant from the federal government, the state, any body corporate and politic therein, or any person, the endowment, bequest, devise, transfer, assignment, option to purchase, other contract, or any combination thereof, of any properties pertaining to a project, or an interest therein;

“Board” means the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming constituting the governing body of the university and a body corporate and politic by the name of “The Trustees of the University of Wyoming”, as a political subdivision of the state and means any successor governing body of the university;

“Commercial bank” means a state or national bank or trust company which is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, including without limitation any trust bank as herein defined;

“Cost of any project”, or any phrase of similar import, means all or any part designated by the board of the cost of any project, or interest therein, which cost, at the option of the board may include all or any part of the incidental costs pertaining to the project, including without limitation:

Preliminary expenses advanced by the university from funds available for use therefor, or advanced by the state, the federal government, or from any other source, with the approval of the board, or any combination thereof;

The costs in the making of surveys, audits, preliminary plans, other plans, specifications, estimates of costs, and other preliminaries;

The costs of premiums on builders’ risk insurance and performance bonds, or a reasonably allocable share thereof;

The costs of appraising, printing, estimates, advice, services of engineers, architects, financial consultants, attorneys at law, clerical help, or other agents or employees;

The costs of making, publishing, posting, mailing and otherwise giving any notice in connection with a project, the filing or recordation of instruments, the taking of options, the issuance of bonds and other securities, and bank fees and expenses;

The costs of contingencies;

The costs of the capitalization with proceeds of bonds or other securities issued hereunder of any operation and maintenance expenses appertaining to any facilities to be acquired as a project and of any interest on bonds or other securities for any period not exceeding the period estimated by the board to effect the project plus one (1) year, of any discount on bonds or other securities and of any reserves for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds or other securities, of any replacement expenses and of any other cost of issuance of the bonds or other securities;

The costs of amending any resolution or other instrument authorizing the issuance of or otherwise appertaining to outstanding bonds or other securities of the university;

The costs of funding any emergency loans, construction loans and other temporary loans of not exceeding three (3) years appertaining to a project and of the incidental expenses incurred in connection with the loans; and

All other expenses necessary or desirable and appertaining to a project, as estimated or otherwise ascertained by the board.

“Facilities” means buildings, structures, or other income producing facilities from the operation of which or in connection with which pledged revenues for the payment of any bonds or other securities issued hereunder are derived, including without limitation any facilities to be acquired with the proceeds of the bonds or securities issued hereunder;

“Federal government” means the United States, or any agency, instrumentality or corporation thereof;

“Federal securities” means bills, certificates of indebtedness, notes, bonds or similar securities which are direct obligations of, or the principal and interest of which securities are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States;

“Gross revenues” or “gross pledged revenues” means all pledged revenues received by the university and pledged for the payment of any securities issued hereunder;

“Holder” when used in conjunction with any bonds or any other securities issued hereunder, means the registered owner of the designated item;

“Improvement” or “improve” means the extension, widening, lengthening, betterment, alteration, reconstruction or other major improvement, or any combination thereof, of any properties pertaining to a project, or an interest therein, but does not mean renovation, reconditioning, patching, general maintenance or other minor repair;

“Net revenues” or “net pledged revenues” means gross revenues after the deduction of operation and maintenance expenses;

“Operation and maintenance expenses” means all reasonable and necessary current expenses of the university, paid or accrued, of operating, maintaining and repairing the facilities pertaining to the pledged revenues for the payment of the bonds or other securities issued hereunder and may include at the board’s option except as limited by contract or otherwise limited by law, without limiting the generality of the foregoing:
(xii) (A) “Operation and maintenance expenses” means all reasonable and necessary current expenses of the university, paid or accrued, of operating, maintaining and repairing the facilities pertaining to the pledged revenues for the payment of the bonds or other securities issued hereunder and may include at the board’s option except as limited by contract or otherwise limited by law, without limiting the generality of the foregoing:

Legal and overhead expenses of the various university departments directly related and reasonably allocable to the administration of the facilities;

Fidelity bond and insurance premiums appertaining to the facilities, or a reasonably allocable share of a premium of any blanket bond or policy pertaining to the facilities;

The reasonable charges of any paying agent, commercial bank, trust bank, or other depository bank appertaining to any securities issued by the board or appertaining to any facilities;

Contractual services, professional services, salaries, administrative expenses and costs of labor appertaining to facilities;

The costs incurred by the board in the collection of all or any part of the pledged revenues, including without limitation revenues appertaining to any facilities;

Any costs of utility services furnished to the facilities by the university or otherwise; and

Reasonable allowances for the depreciation of furniture and equipment for the facilities.

“Operation and maintenance expenses” does not include:

Any allowance for depreciation except as otherwise provided in W.S. 21-17-404(a)(xii)(A)(VI);

Any costs of reconstruction, improvements, extensions or betterments;

Any accumulation of reserves for capital replacements;

Any reserves for operation, maintenance or repair of any facilities;

Any allowance for the redemption of any bond or other security evidencing a loan or other obligations or the payment of any interest thereon;

Any liabilities incurred in the acquisition or improvement of any properties comprising any project or any existing facilities, or any combination thereof; and

Any other ground of legal liability not based on contract.

“Person” means a corporation, firm, other body corporate excluding the federal government, the state, or any other body corporate and politic, partnership, association or individual, and also includes an executor, administrator, trustee, receiver or other representative appointed according to law;

“Pledged revenues” means the monies pledged wholly or in part for the payment of bonds or other securities issued hereunder, and, subject to any existing pledges or other contractual limitations, may include at the board’s discretion, income or monies derived from one (1), all or any combination of the following revenue sources, including without limitation student fees and other fees, rates and charges appertaining thereto:
(xiv) (A) “Pledged revenues” means the monies pledged wholly or in part for the payment of bonds or other securities issued hereunder, and, subject to any existing pledges or other contractual limitations, may include at the board’s discretion, income or monies derived from one (1), all or any combination of the following revenue sources, including without limitation student fees and other fees, rates and charges appertaining thereto:

Dormitories, apartments and other housing facilities;

Cafeterias, dining halls and other food service facilities;

Student union and other student activities facilities;

Store or other facilities for the sale or lease of books, stationery, student supplies, faculty supplies, office supplies and like material;

Stadium, arena, theater, fieldhouse and other athletic or recreation facilities for use in part by spectators or otherwise;

Land and any structures, other facilities, or other improvements thereon used or available for use for the parking of vehicles used for the transportation by land or air of persons to or from the land and any improvements thereon;

Properties providing heat or any other utility furnished by the university to any facilities on its campus;

Services, contracts, investments and other miscellaneous unrestricted sources of income not hereinabove designated, whether presently realized or to be realized, and accounted for in a miscellaneous sales and services fund or account;

That account commonly known as the university account within the permanent land income fund, pursuant to section 8 of the Act of Admission of the state of Wyoming; and

The board’s proportion for the benefit of the university of the monies remitted by the United States to the state and accounted for as provided by law pursuant to W.S.

9-4-601

.

“Pledged revenues” does not include income or monies derived in connection with any of the following:

Any tuition charges and registration fees;

The levy of any general (ad valorem) property taxes;

Any grants, appropriations or other donations from the federal government, the state or any other donor; and

Any buildings, structures, or other facilities of the board not hereinabove designated in this paragraph.

“Chairman of the board” means the de facto or de jure chairman of the trustees of the University of Wyoming, or his successor in functions, if any;

“President of the university” means the de facto or de jure presiding officer of the University of Wyoming and its chief administrative officer, or his successor in functions, if any;

“Project” means any purpose or purposes which the board is otherwise authorized by law to do and to defray the cost of which project the board is otherwise authorized by law to issue bonds or other securities hereunder;

“Registration fees” means any charges paid by any student for the privilege of registering for attendance in the university except for any charges appertaining to those revenue sources provided by W.S. 21-17-404(a)(xiv)(A)(I) through (IX);

“Secretary of the board” means the de facto or de jure secretary of the trustees of the University of Wyoming, or his successor in functions, if any;

“Securities” means notes, warrants, bonds, temporary bonds, and interim debentures authorized to be issued hereunder in the name and on the behalf of the board or of the university for the benefit of the university;

“State” means the state of Wyoming;

“Treasurer of the board” means the de facto or de jure treasurer of the trustees of the University of Wyoming, or his successor in functions, if any;

“Treasurer of the university” means the de facto or de jure deputy treasurer of the board and ex officio treasurer of the University of Wyoming, or his successor in functions, if any;

“Trust bank” means a commercial bank which is authorized to exercise and is exercising trust powers and also means any branch of the federal reserve bank;

“Tuition charges” means the price of, or payment for, general and special instruction of students as defined and determined from time to time by the board;

“United States” means the United States of America;

“University” means the University of Wyoming, the state university located in the city of Laramie, in the county of Albany and state of Wyoming;

“This act” means W.S.

21-17-402

through

21-17-450

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.52; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-404

; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1; ch. 230, § 1; 2019 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(ix), which read: “‘Holder’ when used in conjunction with any coupons, any bonds or any other securities issued hereunder, means the person in possession and the apparent owner of the designated item if the obligation is registered for payment to bearer or is not registered, or means the registered owner of the designated item if it is at the time registered for payment otherwise than to bearer.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 230, § 1, in (a)(xiv)(A)(X), deleted “of not less than nine percent (9%)” after “university” and updated an internal reference.

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both acts.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xv), substituted "chairman" for "president" throughout.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iv)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-17-405.
Securities redeemable out of pledged revenue; board's liability; earnings test; schedule of payments; calculations of university treasurer.

Any bonds or other securities issued under this act, together with any interest accruing thereon and any prior redemption premiums due in connection therewith, are payable and collectible solely out of net pledged revenues. The bond or security holders may not look to any general or other fund for payment of the securities, except the net revenues pledged therefor. The securities shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation, if any limitation appertains thereto. The bonds or other securities shall not be considered or held to be general obligations of the board but shall constitute its special obligations and the board shall not pledge its full faith and credit for payment of the bonds or securities.

None of the covenants, agreements, representations and warranties contained in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or other securities under this act or in any other instrument appertaining thereto, in the absence of any breach thereof, shall ever impose or shall be construed as imposing any liability, obligation, or charge against the board, except the special funds pledged therefor, or against its general credit, payable out of its general fund, or out of any funds derived from taxation.

Before any securities are actually issued payable from any net pledged revenues, except for any securities issued solely for the purpose of funding or refunding or both funding and refunding outstanding securities, any net pledged revenues for the next preceding twelve (12) months, for the next preceding calendar year, or for the next preceding fiscal year, as defined and otherwise determined by the board, shall be sufficient to pay an amount representing one hundred ten percent (110%) of the combined maximum annual principal and interest requirements to be paid during the twelve (12) months, calendar year or fiscal year of any outstanding securities payable from and constituting a lien upon the net pledged revenues and the securities proposed to be issued excluding any reserves therefor except as otherwise expressly provided in this section.

In any determination of whether or not any proposed securities meet the earnings test limiting their issuance as provided in subsection (c) of this section:

There shall be deducted from or added to any gross pledged revenues any estimated decrease or increase in the revenues resulting from any decreased or increased or additional fees, rates or charges fixed by the board, whether or not appertaining to any additional facilities for which the proposed securities are authorized to be issued; and

There shall be deducted from or added to any operation and maintenance expenses any estimated decrease or increase in the expenses, whether or not resulting from any additional facilities for which the proposed securities are authorized to be issued.

The respective annual principal and interest requirements including as an interest requirement the amount of any prior redemption premiums due on any prior redemption date as of which any outstanding securities have been called or have been ordered by the board to be called for prior redemption shall be reduced to the extent the requirements are scheduled to be paid with any monies held in trust or escrow for that purpose in any trust bank subject to any limitations appertaining thereto in section 7, article 15, Wyoming constitution, including without limitation the known minimum yield from any investment or reinvestment of the money under W.S.

21-17-426

.

The estimates and adjustments provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section and the calculations required by subsection (c) of this section shall be made by the treasurer of the university which shall be conclusively presumed to be accurate. This section does not prohibit the issuance of securities merely because there were no pledged revenues nor operation and maintenance expenses, in the absence of such adjustments, in the next preceding twelve (12) months, calendar year, or fiscal year, as the case may be.

This section does not prevent the board from providing an earnings test in any resolution authorizing the issuance of securities or in any other proceedings appertaining thereto which test limits the issuance of any additional securities.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.53; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-405

; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (e), substituted “under W.S.

21-17-426

” for “in federal securities.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-406.
Payment not secured by pledge of university property.

The payment of securities shall not be secured by an encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the board except for pledged revenues. No property of the board except pledged revenues is liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of securities.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.54; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-406

.

§ 21-17-407.
No recourse against trustees.

No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of, any interest on and any prior redemption premiums due in connection with any bonds or other securities of the board or for any claim based thereon or otherwise upon the resolution authorizing their issuance or other instrument appertaining thereto, against any individual trustee of the board, past, present or future, either directly or indirectly through the board or the university, or otherwise, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the endorsement of any penalty or otherwise, all such liability, if any, being by the acceptance of the securities and as a part of the consideration of their issuance specially waived and released.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.55; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-407

.

§ 21-17-408.
Securities not state obligations; state obligations generally.

Any bonds or other securities issued under this act are not securities, debts or obligations of the state and are not enforceable against the state.

The board may not obligate the state except as provided by W.S.

21-17-409

, pledge, assign or encumber in any way or permit the pledging, assigning or encumbering of any revenue paid to the university except as designated in W.S. 21-17-404(a)(xiv)(A)(I) through (VI).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.56; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-408.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-409.
Pledge not to amend or repeal W.S. 21-17-402 through 21-17-450 to impair securities.

The faith of the state is hereby pledged that this act, any law supplemental or otherwise appertaining thereto and any other act concerning the bonds and other securities of the board or the university or the pledged revenues shall not be repealed nor amended or otherwise directly or indirectly modified in such a manner as to impair adversely any outstanding securities of the board until all such securities payable from the pledged revenues have been discharged in full or provision has been fully made therefor, including without limitation the known minimum yield from the investment or reinvestment of monies pledged therefor in investments under W.S.

21-17-426

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.57; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 2; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-409; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “investments under W.S.

21-17-426

” for “federal securities.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-410.
Borrowing or otherwise becoming obligated to defray cost of authorized projects.

Where any project is otherwise authorized by law and where the board is otherwise authorized by law to issue its securities to defray the cost of the project, the board may borrow money or otherwise become obligated for the project and may evidence any obligation by the issuance of the board’s securities.

In connection with any project so authorized, the board, except as otherwise provided, may:

Have and alter a corporate seal;

Sue and be sued;

Acquire and hold property, rights or interests therein and water rights;

Dispose of unnecessary or obsolete property, or rights or interests therein;

Make contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient, as determined by the board;

Acquire by contracts or by its own agents and employees, or otherwise acquire any properties as any project authorized and operate and maintain the properties; and

Accept grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the federal government, the state, any agency or political subdivision thereof, or any person, upon such terms and conditions as the federal government, state, agency or political subdivision, or person may impose.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.58; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-410.

§ 21-17-411.
Types of securities authorized.

The board may issue in one (1) series or more, without their being authorized at any election, in anticipation of net pledged revenues and constituting special obligations of the board, any one (1) or more or all of the following types of securities:

Notes evidencing any amount borrowed by the board;

Warrants evidencing the amount due to any person for any services, or supplies, equipment or other materials furnished to the board or for the benefit of the university and appertaining to an authorized project;

Bonds evidencing any amount borrowed by the board and constituting long-term financing;

Temporary bonds pending the preparation of and exchangeable for definitive bonds of like character and in the principal amount when prepared and issued in compliance with the conditions and limitations provided by this act; and

Interim debentures, evidencing any emergency loans, construction loans, and other temporary loans of not exceeding three (3) years, in supplementation of long-term financing and the issuance of bonds, as provided in W.S.

21-17-433

through

21-17-436

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.59; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-411.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-17-412.
Maturity dates of notes and warrants; extension or funding.

Notes and warrants may mature at such time or times not exceeding one (1) year from the date of their issuance as the board may determine. They shall not be extended or funded except by the issuance of bonds or interim debentures in compliance with W.S.

21-17-433

and other provisions supplemental thereto.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.60; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-412.

§ 21-17-413.
Temporary bonds.

Each temporary bond shall set forth substantially the same conditions, terms and provisions as the definitive bond for which it is exchanged. Each holder of a temporary bond has all rights and remedies which he would have as a holder of the definitive bonds for which the temporary bond is to be exchanged.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.61; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-413.

§ 21-17-414.
Resolution authorizing issuance of securities.

The resolution authorizing the issuance of any securities under this act shall describe the purpose or purposes for which they are issued at least in general terms and may describe any purpose in detail.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.62; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-414.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-415.
General criteria for securities.

Except as otherwise provided, securities issued under this act shall be (a) in a form, (b) issued in a manner, at, above or below par, at public or private sale, and (c) issued with recitals, terms, covenants, conditions and other provisions, as may be provided by the board in a resolution authorizing their issuance and in an indenture or other proceedings appertaining thereto.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.63; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 43; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-415; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2005, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “at a discount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the securities” after “above or below par.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-416.
Recital in resolution that securities are issued pursuant to W.S. 21-17-402 through 21-17-450; effect of recital.

A resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or other securities under this act or an indenture or other proceedings appertaining thereto may provide that the securities contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this act, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.64; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 21-2-416.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-417.
Conditions which may be imposed by board; interest coupons.

As the board may determine, bonds and other securities issued under this act except as otherwise provided shall:

Be of a convenient denomination or denominations;

Be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, W.S. 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603;

Mature at such time or serially at such times in regular numerical order at annual or other designated intervals in amounts designated and fixed by the board, but not exceeding fifty (50) years from their date;

Bear interest at fixed or variable rates to be payable at a time or place whether within or without the state as determined by the board. The board may also enter into interest rate exchange agreements to properly manage interest costs with providers with a Standard & Poor’s rating of at least “AA” or an equivalent rating from any other nationally recognized rating organization;

Be made payable in lawful money of the United States, at the office of the treasurer of the university or any commercial bank or commercial banks;

Be printed at such place as the board may determine.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.65; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 44; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

21-17-417

; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-417; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 143, §§ 1, 2.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “34.1-8-603” for “34.1-8-406.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(iv), which read: “Bear interest to be payable annually, semiannually or at other designated intervals, but the first interest payment date may be for interest accruing for a period not exceeding one (1) year”; and repealed former (b), requiring bonds to have two sets of interest coupons.

Editor's notes. —

The investment securities provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, referred to in subsection (a)(ii), are set out in W.S. 34.1-8-101 to 34.1-8-603.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-17-418.
Board and officers to execute securities; endorsement by university treasurer; facsimile signatures.

Bonds and other securities issued under this act shall be executed in the name of the board, shall be signed by the chairman of the board, shall be attested by the secretary of the board, shall be countersigned by the treasurer of the board and shall be authenticated by the official seal of the board.

The treasurer of the university shall endorse a certificate upon each bond or other security issued under this act that the bond or security is issued pursuant and according to law, does not exceed any lawful debt limit of the board and does not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation.

Any bonds or other securities, including without limitation any certificates endorsed thereon, may be executed as provided in W.S.

16-2-101

through

16-2-103

.

The bonds and other securities, bearing the signatures of the officers in office at the time of the signing thereof, are the valid and binding obligations of the board notwithstanding that before the delivery and payment of the bonds or securities, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to fill their respective offices.

Any officer authorized or permitted to sign any bonds or any other securities, at the time of their execution and of a signature certificate appertaining thereto, may adopt as and for his own facsimile signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event that the facsimile signature appears upon the bonds and other securities appertaining thereto, or any combination thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.66; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-418; Laws 2005, ch. 143, § 1; 2019 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted provisions pertaining to coupons.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “chairman” for “president.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).

§ 21-17-419.
Redemption prior to maturity.

The board may provide for the redemption of any or all of the bonds or other securities prior to maturity, in such order, by lot or otherwise, at such time or times, without or with the payment of the premium or premiums not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of each bond or other security so redeemed, and otherwise upon such terms as may be provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the securities or other instrument appertaining thereto.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.67; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 45; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-419.

§ 21-17-420.
Repurchase of securities by board.

Any bonds or other securities may be repurchased by the board out of any funds available for that purpose at a price of not more than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, plus the amount of the premium, if any, which might on the next prior redemption date of the securities be paid to the holders thereof if the securities should be called for redemption on such date pursuant to their terms. All securities repurchased shall be cancelled. If the securities may not be called for prior redemption at the board’s option within one (1) year from the date of their purchase, they may be repurchased without limitation as to price.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.68; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-420.

§ 21-17-421.
Use of proceeds from issuance of securities; accrued interest and premiums.

All monies received from the issuance of any securities under this act shall be used solely for the purpose or purposes for which issued and to defray the cost of the project thereby delineated. Any accrued interest and any premium shall be applied to the cost of the project or to the payment of the interest on or the principal of the securities, or both, or shall be deposited in a reserve therefor, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 206, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 21-444.69; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-421.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-17-404(a)(xxviii).